District of Columbia statutes.
29-1303.04

Benefit officer.

(a)

A benefit corporation may designate a benefit officer.

(b)

A benefit officer shall have:

(1)

The powers and duties relating to the purpose of the corporation to create general public benefit or specific public benefit provided:

(A)

By the bylaws; or

(B)

Absent controlling provisions in the bylaws, by resolutions or orders of the board of directors; and

(2)

The duty to prepare the benefit report required by § 29-1304.01.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-305, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2735

History

This section is referenced in § 29-1301.02.

Section References